Washington statutes.
RCW 36.67.570

Liberal construction—Effect of other acts.

This chapter shall be complete authority for the issuance of the revenue bonds hereby authorized, and shall be liberally construed to accomplish its purposes. Any restrictions, limitations or regulations relative to the issuance of such revenue bonds contained in any other act shall not apply to the bonds issued under this chapter. Any act inconsistent herewith shall be deemed modified to conform with the provisions of this chapter for the purpose of this chapter only.

[ 1965 c 142 s 7.]